Wisconsin, session 2025, SB27.
do enact as follows:SB27,13Section 1. 230.35 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB27,2,24230.35 (6) (a) In this subsection, “state agency” has the meaning of “agency” 5given in s. 230.03 (3), except that “state agency” includes the Board of Regents of the 6University of Wisconsin System, the legislature, the courts, and a board, a 1commission, a committee, a council, or a department or unit thereof or an authority 2created under subch. II of ch. 114 or under ch. 231, 232, 233, 234, 237, 238, or 279.SB27,2,73(b) Each state agency shall require employees of that state agency to perform 4their assigned work duties at the offices of the state agency during the employee’s 5regularly scheduled work hours. This paragraph does not apply to telehealth 6services or duties that were performed off site, rather than at the offices of the state 7agency, before March 1, 2020.SB27,28Section 2. Effective date.SB27,2,99(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2025.SB27,2,1010